Utah statutes.
76-6-902.   Prohibitions.

(1)  It is unlawful for any person to intentionally alter, remove, injure, or destroy antiquities from state lands or private lands without the landowner's consent.

(2)  It is unlawful to intentionally reproduce, rework, or forge any antiquities or make any object, whether copies or not, or falsely label, describe, identify, or offer for sale or exchange any object with the intent to represent the object as original and genuine, nor may any person offer any object for sale or exchange that was collected or excavated in violation of this chapter.

